Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.77.040

Executive director.

(1) The council shall employ an executive director. The executive director shall be appointed by the governor from a list of three names submitted by the council. However, the governor may request, and the council shall provide, an additional list or lists from which the governor shall select the executive director. The governor may dismiss the executive director only with the approval of a majority vote of the council. The council, by a majority vote, may dismiss the executive director.

(2) The executive director may employ necessary deputy and assistant directors and other exempt staff under chapter 41.06 RCW, who shall serve at the executive director's pleasure on such terms and conditions as he or she determines. Subject to the provisions of chapter 41.06 RCW, the executive director may appoint and employ such other employees as may be required for the proper discharge of the functions of the council.

[ 2012 c 229 s 107.]